Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202553-123.19
Auction permit; when required; rights of licensee; holder of license; duties.

(1) The commission may issue an auction permit to an auction house which authorizes the holder thereof to sell alcoholic liquor at auction as prescribed in this section.

(2) An auction house may apply in a manner prescribed by the commission for an auction permit from the commission. An auction permit shall be required for the sale at auction of (a) alcoholic liquor previously sold to a retailer that is no longer in operation or (b) alcoholic liquor that had previously been sold at retail to a consumer in the State of Nebraska in a private collection.

(3) An auction house that holds an auction permit shall notify the commission of all auctions and provide inventories of the product to be sold.

(4) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 2025, LB478, § 2.